Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General

§ 21-3-101.
School districts bodies corporate.

Each school district now or hereafter legally organized within this state shall be a body corporate.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 3925; R.S. 1899, § 529; C.S. 1910, § 1933; C.S. 1920, § 2237; R.S. 1931, § 99-315; C.S. 1945, § 67-605; W.S. 1957, § 21-113; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 17; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-17.

School districts are granted corporate status.

Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Status of school districts is one of a public corporation or quasi-corporation. Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

In, but not of, county. —

School districts are corporations, not of the county, but in the county. Powder River Cattle Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 3 Wyo. 597, 29 P. 361, 31 P. 278,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1892), overruled, Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1898).

They may hold property, contract and sue or be sued. —

School districts, as bodies corporate, are empowered to hold property, and be parties to suits and contracts. School Dist. No. 3 v. Western Tube Co., 13 Wyo. 304, 80 P. 155,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1895).

A school district is distinct from a municipal corporation.

Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Teton Plumbing & Heating, Inc. v. Board of Trustees, 763 P.2d 843,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 21-3-102.
Elementary school districts.

Every school district in the state offering an educational program in grades kindergarten through eight (8) only is hereby declared to be an elementary school district. The name of an elementary school district shall be in form as follows: “Elementary School District No.
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , in the County of
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , and State of Wyoming.”

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-18; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

“Grade school” defined. —

“Grade school” means a school in which there are grades, or a school divided into grades and it can apply only to a graded school, as technically speaking there are no grades in an ungraded school. Board of Comm'rs v. State, 24 Wyo. 364, 158 P. 801,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1916).

§ 21-3-103.
High school districts.

Every school district in the state offering an educational program in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) only is hereby declared to be a high school district. The name of a high school district shall be in form as follows: “ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
High School District, State of Wyoming.”

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 67, § 2; 1907, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2052; C.S. 1920, § 2389; R.S. 1931, § 99-502; C.S. 1945, § 67-902; W.S. 1957, § 21-173; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 19; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-19.

§ 21-3-104.
Unified school districts.

Every school district in the state offering an educational program in grades kindergarten through twelve (12) is hereby declared to be a unified school district. The name of a unified school district shall be in form as follows: “ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
County School District Number
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , State of Wyoming.”

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-20; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

Stated

in

Hankins v. District Boundary Bd., 502 P.2d 368,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1972); Johnson v. Schrader, 502 P.2d 371,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 21-3-105.
Board of trustees to be governing body; quorum; majority vote.

The board of trustees of a school district shall be the governing body of the school district. A majority of the number of members of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of the board of trustees. No action of the board of trustees shall be valid unless such action shall receive the approval of a majority of the members elected to the board of trustees.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-21.

Cross references. —

As to election of school district trustees, see §§

22-22-101

through

22-22-304

.

Board has wide discretion in management of district's affairs

and will not be interfered with by the courts unless its actions are shown to be arbitrary, capricious or fraudulent. Hyatt v. Big Horn Sch. Dist., 636 P.2d 525,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1981).

Resolution to accept bid submitted in response to published invitation creates binding contract. —

A resolution by a school board to accept a bid to demolish a school, which bid was submitted in response to a published invitation, created a binding contract as soon as the bidder had notice of the award. Robert W. Anderson Housewrecking & Excavating v. Board of Trustees, 681 P.2d 1326,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1984).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Colwell, 611 P.2d 427,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Teton Plumbing & Heating, Inc. v. Board of Trustees, 763 P.2d 843,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1988); Laramie County Sch. Dist. #2 v. Albin Cats Charter Sch., Inc., 2005 WY 43,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 49

, 109 P.3d 552 (2005).

§ 21-3-106.
Oath of trustees.

The trustees of each school district shall, within ten (10) days after receiving notification of their election or appointment and before assuming the duties of their offices, appear before some person qualified to administer oaths and take an oath for the faithful performance of their duties as required by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 3924; Laws 1890, ch. 77, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 528; C.S. 1910, § 1929; C.S. 1920, § 2227; R.S. 1931, § 99-303; C.S. 1945, § 67-604; W.S. 1957, § 21-112; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 22; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-22; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1997, ch. 189, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to persons authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 21-3-107.
Trustees to serve without compensation; mileage.

The members of the boards of trustees of each school district shall serve without compensation; provided, that the members may receive mileage to and from board meetings at a rate not to exceed the maximum allowed by law for state employees.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-23.

Cross references. —

As to mileage rate, see §

9-3-103

.

Quoted

in

Michie v. Board of Trustees, 847 P.2d 1006,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 21-3-108.
Filling vacancy on board of trustees.

A vacancy occurring for any cause upon the board of trustees of any school district shall be filled within thirty (30) days by action of the remaining members of the board. A person chosen to fill a vacancy shall serve until the next election of school district trustees. An election shall then be held to fill the unexpired term.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 93, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 3943; R.S. 1899, § 548; Laws 1901, ch. 58, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1951; C.S. 1920, § 2255; R.S. 1931, § 99-330; C.S. 1945, § 67-613; W.S. 1957, § 21-121; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 24; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-24; Laws 1987, ch. 222, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to date of election, see §

22-22-102

.

§ 21-3-109.
When vacancy on board deemed to have occurred.

A vacancy shall have occurred in the membership of any board of trustees of any school district if any member:

Dies;

Resigns;

Becomes a nonresident of the school district; or

Becomes a nonresident of the trustee residence area from which elected in those districts subdivided into trustee residence areas.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-25.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.